Hawaii statutes.
[§414D-147] Quorum and voting. (a)
Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the articles, or the bylaws, a
quorum of a board of directors consists of a majority of the directors in
office immediately before a meeting begins. In no event may the articles or
bylaws authorize a quorum of fewer than the greater of one-third of the number
of directors in office or two directors.

(b) If a quorum is present when a vote is
taken, the affirmative vote of a majority of directors present is the act of
the board unless this chapter, the articles, or the bylaws require the vote of
a greater number of directors. [L 2001, c 105, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next